Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6047
Council; members; terms; vacancies.

Members shall be appointed for three-year terms. Vacancies in any position on the council shall be filled for the unexpired portion of the term by appointment by the Governor in the same manner as provided for the original appointments.

Laws 1967, c. 452, § 5, p. 1401;

Laws 1989, LB 344, § 18;

R.S.Supp.,1989, § 71-2035.